Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB680.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "health care practitioner" in section 3 of the act of July 17, 2024 (P.L.846, No.74), known as the Fair Contracting for Health Care Practitioners Act, is amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Health care practitioner." The following:* * *(6) An individual who practices speech-language pathology under the act of December 21, 1984 (P.L.1253, 1234567891011121314151617181920 No.238), known as the Speech-Language Pathologists and Audiologists Licensure Act.(7) An occupational therapist as defined in section 3 of the act of June 15, 1982 (P.L.502, No.140), known as the Occupational Therapy Practice Act.(8) A physical therapist as defined in section 2 of the act of October 10, 1975 (P.L.383, No.110), known as the Physical Therapy Practice Act.(9) A respiratory therapist as described in section 13.1 of the Medical Practice Act of 1985. * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0680PN0806 - 2 - 123456789101112